ext/spell/lv_LV.dic
aizlaist/JE+]N2I
aizplēst/+IJMFe43
aizsitušu/+
aizskart/+BI6h(5J[M
aizstatīt/+dBc[JhIb(Mg1C
aiztecēt/+g1BIdbJM[
aiztelegrafēt/+)$bBIHMJ1
aiztīt/+aIBd[JM4
aizvannot/+bgB{HG1d0
aizziest/IJ+EN2
aizžūžot/b$H)+1IMBJ
apdurt/(+BJIhM56
apkaltēt/M+)$IgHBbdG1J[{
apkustēt/h+1bBIJMC
apkārst/M+F
aplāpīt/+h(bJ[BIM1C
aplīgot/M+I$BHb)J1
aplūzt/eBI+M4
apmelot/+J$bGgdH)I1B{M
apmist/+INJ5
applūst/+%EI7JN
appost/+0MJ4F3
apsmacēt/+MB$IHb)J1
apstiepjošies/+
apstādināt/+gb(I[JhdcMB1C
apzagt/+aJ[IMBd4
apziest/EI+2J]N
apārstēt/)+I{bJGgBd1$MH[
apģipsēt/JI1$+BHb)M
apšalkt/B5+Ia%JM6
apšķīstīt/dgG+B01C
ataust/e+%FNI2J7]M4
atdārdināt/+(BdIbhCc1g[JM
atkalpot/+b{$I)B1gGJdHM
atkost/+EJ2NI]
atkraukt/6a+JI%MB5
atkurkstēt/hB+JIb1MC
atmiekšķēt/GJ+BdHbgI1$[){M
atmirt/+IZJ^eB7M4
atmuldēt/+BhIJbCM1
atplēst/+IJFeM34
atpļāpāt/I+MbG[d)${gHBJ1
atritēt/bI+CB1JM
atsteigt/+%aJdIMB[56
atsviest/E+I2JN
atvelkot/+
atķiķināt/(+hdbJBc[CIgM1
atšņorēt/+gb{$MH[I1BdJG
atņirgt/+Iad%MB5J6[
bagarēt/J)+bIH$M1B
blenzt/eJ+I6MB4
bukņīt/H+bB)$1IJM
divkāršot/+IdbgMJ$){BHG1
dvest/F+I4eJM3
dzelt/[d+IB5a6MJ
fraktēt/)I+GdBb$[Hg1{JM
gaisināt/+BCIhb(1JM
gaudot/b+$IM{)JdBHGg1
grūst/+E2N]
hidrogenēt/b1BI)G+HM$g{d[J
ieaijāt/H1g+Ib)GdB$M[J{
ieelst/eI+FJ[4M}3
iekniest/eI+JF3M4
iekrakšķēt/b+[JCcI(hMdBg1
iekraut/5$+BI)M6J[
iekurošies/+
iekāsēt/BdIb+G$Hg){1[JM
ielāsmot/+b)$MH1IBJ
ienīst/I7E+%NJ
ieplīst/+%eFM4IJ7
iesauļot/+$d)bg{BHIJ1MG
iesilt/JI+^Z4BeM7
ieskaitīt/h+bg(B[JIdc1MC
iesmelgt/+MaJdIB65[
iesviest/I+EJ2]N
ietekam/+
ievākt/IM5B%+adJ[6
ievīterot/+JHIM$b1B)
iešļākt/6%I+d[aMJB5
irdināt/[+hCcb(MIgdBJ1
izaulekšot/+b)g{BMI$JGHd1
izcirpt/I+deMB4J[
izdusēt/+dJBIgbM[c(Ch1
izdzist/eI+MJF4
izgavēt/+dG{IJg[$bM)1BH
izgrūst/+2EN
izkalkulēt/)I$HbBJ1+M
izkasīt/+B(1IbhcJ[dgMC
izkviekt/+%JBdaI6[M5
izlodēt/+Ib{$J[Gdg)1BHM
iznērst/eF+I3MJ4
izravēt/IBJ+b)$HM1
izriezt/+[6eBI4M
izskrāpēt/J+1$)HbIBM
izsmalstīt/h+gIcdbB(1JM[C
izsolīt/bIcg+M(hdB1JC
izsoļot/+bIB$d{1g)MJGH
izspriest/+E2I]JN
iztaujāt/[b+G${Bgd)IJ1HM
iztrenkt/+%aIB[6MJ5
izšķirošo/+
izšķīst/Eq+
karst/+%eFIJM74
knaibīt/+hbgc([BJIdC1M
komunicēt/d+b)I{[JM$GgHB1
konstatēt/$I1HbB)+JM
konverģēt/)+bgBIJGd1[$MH{
kurt/+h(JIM[dB56
kārt/e+B4JdM[0
luncināt/+bMhg(BIJcCd1[
mijušam/+
mizot/+)bIg$dMBJ1HG{
neitralizēt/+JI1$BbH)M
noblēdīt/+)gH$bBd1[IMGJ{
nodvest/+eMIJ4F3
nodzeldināt/+JCbhMB(1I
nohalturēt/b+g)$J[IMdBH1G{
nojumt/$)+JeI6MB4
nojēgt/5+[%aIMBJ6
nokrekšķināt/+I[JdcCBbgM(1h
nokārst/+eMF
nolaist/E+2N]J
nolatviskot/+JdGgI1Bb{HM
nomeditēt/$+)gHbI1MdBJ[G{
nomīlēt/+(IhBbCJM1
noraust/Fh+e[M
norobot/B+Ib1MH$J
noskrāpēt/G)bHgIB+{$d1M[J
noslīpētāks/+oi
nosprāgt/+^7ZIJaBM4
nostrūklot/+bJI)MB1H$
nosvīst/%IE+7JN
notaupīt/hbI(+c[gdJMBC1
noķiķināt/(+bdhBcCIgMJ[1
noņirbēt/b+(1BIhMJC
nožadzinājušies/+
nožaut/+J5$)MB6I
orientēt/+)G$dMI1gBHb[{J
ost/E+2JN]
pabēdāt/[H+b$dB)G{MJIg1
padefilēt/bJ$+)HBI1M
padzist/eIF+J4M
padzēst/M+eFIJ43
palejaties/+
pamirguļot/J)I+b$HB1M
pamirkšķināt/b(+dBhIg1Cc[JM
panest/+(hF[}I4JMe8
panīst/I7E+%]JN
paozonēt/b$H+IJ)B1M
papiketēt/$+IMJbB)H1
papogāt/+)I[JMbdBG1g$H{
pareibt/+^ZeI7MJB4
patraukt/+dI%aB6J[M5
patēst/M3+IeFJ4
paverdzināt/cI+dhgb1(BJC[M
pazīdīt/+(MIbcgdJ[Bh1C
pašļukt/+4B0
perkutēt/+[{GJ$dBIgb)H1M
pieblīst/+NEI7%J
piecieti/+
piekaut/+)IJ$5M6B
piekust/+FIeJ4M
pieložņāt/IB+Jbg1[d$){GMH
piemirt/+^JZ7BeIM4
piemīcīt/+IBcJdb1[gMC
pienākt/8BIJa5d+(h}[M
pierijiet/+
pietašķīt/(b+IHG1gd[J$MBc){C
pieziest/E2+IJN
pieļumt/+Me^JIZ7B4
plēs/+
plīst/I%+JeF47M
puteņot/)bI+$BJHM1
pārgaiņāt/+)J$bHMIB1
pārgrimēt/I+MbG{HdB[g)$1J
pārjūgt/a+%IB5J6M
pārklejot/)G+BI$Jg1Md{bH
pārlīgt/+aJ^MIZ7B4
pārreibināt/BIhbg(+cd1J[CM
pārskaldīt/+(Ib1B[McdhJgC
pārsviest/+IE2JN]
pārtuvināšanos/+
pārvērst/3IF4BM+[}
pāržilbt/+^ZeIB4J7M
raut/I$+5)dJB6
ripot/$BI)1+bHJM
rāt/[JGd+BbI1g)6${M
saaicināt/Ibc+Md[h(g1BJC
sadejot/+)Ib1gJBdGHM${
sakaunināt/gM+Icdbh[J(CB1
sakāst/e+FJI}[M4
samijāmies/+
saostīt/bg+(cBI1hJd[MC
saraust/+heF[M
sasviest/+EJIN2
sasērot/+J)$bHMBI1
sasēt/+^gB)I{b$dZ7MGJ61
satrināt/+hC
satvert/+(Jh6IdB[5M
sazelēt/+)$IdbJ[{GgBH1M
saķepēt/dBI$+{JG[)Hbg1M
smējušam/+
stigt/+IJaBM4
uzaudzināt/+Igb(1BMdhc[JC
uzbriest/I+E%J7N
uzbrāzmot/$)M+bJBI1H
uzkalst/+IB
uzkarsēt/$+IBM1b)HJ
uzkraukt/%a+5IB6JM
uzkārst/+eMF
uzputot/IB1g+b{G)$HJdM
uzsteberēt/$+bIB1MJH
uzsukāt/b)$+I1gBGHd[{JM
uztrāpīt/+MbI1gcJhB(Cd[
uzvēst/M3+IeFJ4
uzšķērst/E+I]NJ2
zviegt/+%aI[dB5JM6
ķerstīt/+bd(hIgc1JBM[C
špikot/+BM)$bHI1J
